Ohio, session 136, HB85.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 123.14 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 123.14. (A) Every two years, the department of 7
administrative services shall conduct a comprehensive study and 8
issue a report on all real property owned or leased by the state 9
or a state agency. The director of administrative services shall 10
deliver the report to the speaker of the house of 11
representatives, the president of the senate, and the governor 12
not later than the thirty-first day of January of every odd- 13
numbered year. The study shall include all of the following: 14
(1) A complete list of all the real property owned by the 15
state or a state agency. The list shall be organized by who owns 16
the real property, which shall include information regarding the 17
nature of the real property, such as whether the real property 18
includes structures, whether any structure is office space, the 19

H. B. No. 85 Page 2
As Introduced
value of the real property, the cost of maintaining the real 20
property, and what percentage of the real property is used or 21
unused by the state or state agency. 22
(2) A complete list of all the real property that the 23
state or a state agency rents or leases, but does not own, and 24
the cost of renting or leasing; 25
(3) Which state agencies use the real property, whether 26
owned or leased, and the square footage that is used, versus not 27
used, organized by state agency; 28
(4) How much of the real property identified in division 29
(A)(3) of this section would be used if all employees of that 30
agency worked in person, rather than remote. 31
(B) As used in this section, "state agency" means every 32
organized body, office, or agency established by the laws of the 33
state for the exercise of any function of state government, 34
including the nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 35
of the Revised Code, but not including the courts or any 36
judicial agency, any state-assisted institution of higher 37
education, or any local agency. 38